Utah statutes.
20A-7-201.   Statewide initiatives -- Signature requirements -- Submission to the Legislature or to a vote of the people.

(1) (a)  A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to the Legislature for approval or rejection shall obtain:

(i)  legal signatures equal to 5% of the cumulative total of all votes cast by voters of this state for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected; and

(ii)  from each of at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 5% of the total of all votes cast in that district for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected.

(b)  If, at any time not less than 10 days before the beginning of the next annual general session of the Legislature, immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202 and specified on the petition under Section 20A-7-203 the lieutenant governor declares sufficient any initiative petition that is signed by enough voters to meet the requirements of this Subsection (1), the lieutenant governor shall deliver a copy of the petition and the cover sheet required by Subsection (1)(c) to the president of the Senate, the speaker of the House, and the director of the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel.

(c)  In delivering a copy of the petition, the lieutenant governor shall include a cover sheet that contains:

(i)  the cumulative total of all votes cast by voters of this state for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected;

(ii)  the total of all votes cast in each Utah State Senate district for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected;

(iii)  the total number of certified signatures received for the submitted initiative; and

(iv)  the total number of certified signatures received from each Utah State Senate district for the submitted initiative.

(2) (a)  A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to a vote of the people for approval or rejection shall obtain:

(i)  legal signatures equal to 10% of the cumulative total of all votes cast by voters of this state for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected; and

(ii)  from each of at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 10% of the total of all votes cast in that district for all candidates for President of the United States at the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected.

(b)  If an initiative petition meets the requirements of this part and the lieutenant governor declares the initiative petition to be sufficient, the lieutenant governor shall submit the proposed law to a vote of the people at the next regular general election:

(i)  immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202; and

(ii)  specified on the petition under Section 20A-7-203.

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall provide the following information from the official canvass of the last regular general election at which a President of the United States was elected to any interested person:

(a)  the cumulative total of all votes cast by voters in this state for all candidates for President of the United States; and

(b)  for each Utah State Senate district, the total of all votes cast in that district for all candidates for President of the United States.



Amended by Chapter 17, 2011 General Session

